Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2202
Error in platting; application; district court; contents.

The application presented to the district court of the county in which the territory lies shall: (1) Contain a recital of the resolution of the council or board of trustees for correction and reestablishment of the corporate limits and the vote thereon; (2) set forth the name of the plat or plats, the date of record, the book and page of the record book in which such plat or plats have been recorded, and the book and page of the record in which the original charter and annexations, if any there be, are recorded; (3) describe in general terms the area contained within the corporate limits and the territory affected by the corrections and reestablishment sought; (4) set forth the streets and alleys of such area which are maintained or used; and (5) be supported by exhibits consisting of a certificate of the county treasurer of the county in which the territory lies showing the years for which the real estate and the property therein situated shall have been subject to the tax levy of such city or village and a certificate of the city or village clerk or other officer having custody of the sign-in registers for elections of the city or village in which the territory lies showing the years during which the inhabitants thereof enjoyed the right of franchise in the elections of such city or village. The application shall pray for an order of the district court correcting and reestablishing the corporate limits of the city or village to include such territory.

Laws 1955, c. 60, § 2, p. 190;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 3.